Massachusetts, session 194th, HD4993.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1 Subsection (b) of section 91 of chapter 32 of the General Laws is hereby
amended by striking the words “nine hundred and sixty hours” and inserting the following
words:- fifteen hundred hoursSECTION 2. Subsection (c) of said section 91 of chapter 32 of the
General Laws is hereby amended by striking the words “nine hundred and sixty” and inserting
the following words:- fifteen hundred.
of 1